gc_lang/fr/dictionnaire/orthographe/FRANCAIS_5.aff
FLAG long
# élisions pour formes transitives et pronominales
SFX c4 Y 384
SFX c4   er         er/n'q'd'l'm't's'         er                  po:infi
SFX c4   er         ant/n'q'l'm't's'          [^cg]er             po:ppre
SFX c4   écer       éçant/n'q'l'm't's'        écer                po:ppre
SFX c4   éger       égeant/n'q'l'm't's'       éger                po:ppre
SFX c4   ébrer      èbre/n'q'j'l'm't's'       ébrer               po:ipre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX c4   écer       èce/n'q'j'l'm't's'        écer                po:ipre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX c4   écher      èche/n'q'j'l'm't's'       écher               po:ipre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX c4   écrer      ècre/n'q'j'l'm't's'       écrer               po:ipre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX c4   éder       ède/n'q'j'l'm't's'        éder                po:ipre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX c4   éger       ège/n'q'j'l'm't's'        éger                po:ipre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX c4   égler      ègle/n'q'j'l'm't's'       égler               po:ipre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX c4   égner      ègne/n'q'j'l'm't's'       égner               po:ipre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX c4   égrer      ègre/n'q'j'l'm't's'       égrer               po:ipre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX c4   éguer      ègue/n'q'j'l'm't's'       éguer               po:ipre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX c4   éler       èle/n'q'j'l'm't's'        éler                po:ipre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX c4   émer       ème/n'q'j'l'm't's'        émer                po:ipre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX c4   éner       ène/n'q'j'l'm't's'        éner                po:ipre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX c4   éper       èpe/n'q'j'l'm't's'        éper                po:ipre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX c4   équer      èque/n'q'j'l'm't's'       équer               po:ipre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX c4   érer       ère/n'q'j'l'm't's'        érer                po:ipre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX c4   éser       èse/n'q'j'l'm't's'        éser                po:ipre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX c4   éter       ète/n'q'j'l'm't's'        éter                po:ipre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX c4   étrer      ètre/n'q'j'l'm't's'       étrer               po:ipre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX c4   évrer      èvre/n'q'j'l'm't's'       évrer               po:ipre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX c4   éyer       èye/n'q'j'l'm't's'        éyer                po:ipre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX c4   er         è/n'q'l'm't'              er                  po:ipre po:1isg                       di:R
SFX c4   ébrer      èbres/n'q'l'm't'          ébrer               po:ipre po:spre po:2sg
SFX c4   écer       èces/n'q'l'm't'           écer                po:ipre po:spre po:2sg
SFX c4   écher      èches/n'q'l'm't'          écher               po:ipre po:spre po:2sg
SFX c4   écrer      ècres/n'q'l'm't'          écrer               po:ipre po:spre po:2sg
SFX c4   éder       èdes/n'q'l'm't'           éder                po:ipre po:spre po:2sg
SFX c4   éger       èges/n'q'l'm't'           éger                po:ipre po:spre po:2sg
SFX c4   égler      ègles/n'q'l'm't'          égler               po:ipre po:spre po:2sg
SFX c4   égner      ègnes/n'q'l'm't'          égner               po:ipre po:spre po:2sg
SFX c4   égrer      ègres/n'q'l'm't'          égrer               po:ipre po:spre po:2sg
SFX c4   éguer      ègues/n'q'l'm't'          éguer               po:ipre po:spre po:2sg
SFX c4   éler       èles/n'q'l'm't'           éler                po:ipre po:spre po:2sg
SFX c4   émer       èmes/n'q'l'm't'           émer                po:ipre po:spre po:2sg
SFX c4   éner       ènes/n'q'l'm't'           éner                po:ipre po:spre po:2sg
SFX c4   éper       èpes/n'q'l'm't'           éper                po:ipre po:spre po:2sg
SFX c4   équer      èques/n'q'l'm't'          équer               po:ipre po:spre po:2sg
SFX c4   érer       ères/n'q'l'm't'           érer                po:ipre po:spre po:2sg
SFX c4   éser       èses/n'q'l'm't'           éser                po:ipre po:spre po:2sg
SFX c4   éter       ètes/n'q'l'm't'           éter                po:ipre po:spre po:2sg
SFX c4   étrer      ètres/n'q'l'm't'          étrer               po:ipre po:spre po:2sg
SFX c4   évrer      èvres/n'q'l'm't'          évrer               po:ipre po:spre po:2sg
SFX c4   éyer       èyes/n'q'l'm't'           éyer                po:ipre po:spre po:2sg
SFX c4   er         ons/n'q'l't'              [^cg]er             po:ipre po:1pl
SFX c4   écer       éçons/n'q'l't'            écer                po:ipre po:1pl
SFX c4   éger       égeons/n'q'l't'           éger                po:ipre po:1pl
SFX c4   er         ez/n'q'l'm'               er                  po:ipre po:2pl
SFX c4   ébrer      èbrent/n'q'l'm't's'       ébrer               po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX c4   écer       ècent/n'q'l'm't's'        écer                po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX c4   écher      èchent/n'q'l'm't's'       écher               po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX c4   écrer      ècrent/n'q'l'm't's'       écrer               po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX c4   éder       èdent/n'q'l'm't's'        éder                po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX c4   éger       ègent/n'q'l'm't's'        éger                po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX c4   égler      èglent/n'q'l'm't's'       égler               po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX c4   égner      ègnent/n'q'l'm't's'       égner               po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX c4   égrer      ègrent/n'q'l'm't's'       égrer               po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX c4   éguer      èguent/n'q'l'm't's'       éguer               po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX c4   éler       èlent/n'q'l'm't's'        éler                po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX c4   émer       èment/n'q'l'm't's'        émer                po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX c4   éner       ènent/n'q'l'm't's'        éner                po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX c4   éper       èpent/n'q'l'm't's'        éper                po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX c4   équer      èquent/n'q'l'm't's'       équer               po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX c4   érer       èrent/n'q'l'm't's'        érer                po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX c4   éser       èsent/n'q'l'm't's'        éser                po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX c4   éter       ètent/n'q'l'm't's'        éter                po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX c4   étrer      ètrent/n'q'l'm't's'       étrer               po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX c4   évrer      èvrent/n'q'l'm't's'       évrer               po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX c4   éyer       èyent/n'q'l'm't's'        éyer                po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX c4   er         ais/n'q'j'l'm't'          [^cg]er             po:iimp po:1sg po:2sg
SFX c4   écer       éçais/n'q'j'l'm't'        écer                po:iimp po:1sg po:2sg
SFX c4   éger       égeais/n'q'j'l'm't'       éger                po:iimp po:1sg po:2sg
SFX c4   er         ait/n'q'l'm't's'          [^cg]er             po:iimp po:3sg
SFX c4   écer       éçait/n'q'l'm't's'        écer                po:iimp po:3sg
SFX c4   éger       égeait/n'q'l'm't's'       éger                po:iimp po:3sg
SFX c4   er         ions/n'q'l't'             er                  po:iimp po:spre po:1pl
SFX c4   er         iez/n'q'l'm'              er                  po:iimp po:spre po:2pl
SFX c4   er         aient/n'q'l'm't's'        [^cg]er             po:iimp po:3pl
SFX c4   écer       éçaient/n'q'l'm't's'      écer                po:iimp po:3pl
SFX c4   éger       égeaient/n'q'l'm't's'     éger                po:iimp po:3pl
SFX c4   er         ai/n'q'j'l'm't'           [^cg]er             po:ipsi po:1sg
SFX c4   écer       éçai/n'q'j'l'm't'         écer                po:ipsi po:1sg
SFX c4   éger       égeai/n'q'j'l'm't'        éger                po:ipsi po:1sg
SFX c4   er         as/n'q'l'm't'             [^cg]er             po:ipsi po:2sg
SFX c4   écer       éças/n'q'l'm't'           écer                po:ipsi po:2sg
SFX c4   éger       égeas/n'q'l'm't'          éger                po:ipsi po:2sg
SFX c4   er         a/n'q'l'm't's'            [^cg]er             po:ipsi po:3sg
SFX c4   écer       éça/n'q'l'm't's'          écer                po:ipsi po:3sg
SFX c4   éger       égea/n'q'l'm't's'         éger                po:ipsi po:3sg
SFX c4   er         âmes/n'q'l't'             [^cg]er             po:ipsi po:1pl
SFX c4   écer       éçâmes/n'q'l't'           écer                po:ipsi po:1pl
SFX c4   éger       égeâmes/n'q'l't'          éger                po:ipsi po:1pl
SFX c4   er         âtes/n'q'l'm'             [^cg]er             po:ipsi po:2pl
SFX c4   écer       éçâtes/n'q'l'm'           écer                po:ipsi po:2pl
SFX c4   éger       égeâtes/n'q'l'm'          éger                po:ipsi po:2pl
SFX c4   er         èrent/n'q'l'm't's'        er                  po:ipsi po:3pl!
SFX c4   er         erai/n'q'j'l'm't'         er                  po:ifut po:1sg            di:M
SFX c4   ébrer      èbrerai/n'q'j'l'm't'      ébrer               po:ifut po:1sg            di:R
SFX c4   écer       ècerai/n'q'j'l'm't'       écer                po:ifut po:1sg            di:R
SFX c4   écher      ècherai/n'q'j'l'm't'      écher               po:ifut po:1sg            di:R
SFX c4   écrer      ècrerai/n'q'j'l'm't'      écrer               po:ifut po:1sg            di:R
SFX c4   éder       èderai/n'q'j'l'm't'       éder                po:ifut po:1sg            di:R
SFX c4   éger       ègerai/n'q'j'l'm't'       éger                po:ifut po:1sg            di:R
SFX c4   égler      èglerai/n'q'j'l'm't'      égler               po:ifut po:1sg            di:R
SFX c4   égner      ègnerai/n'q'j'l'm't'      égner               po:ifut po:1sg            di:R
SFX c4   égrer      ègrerai/n'q'j'l'm't'      égrer               po:ifut po:1sg            di:R
SFX c4   éguer      èguerai/n'q'j'l'm't'      éguer               po:ifut po:1sg            di:R
SFX c4   éler       èlerai/n'q'j'l'm't'       éler                po:ifut po:1sg            di:R
SFX c4   émer       èmerai/n'q'j'l'm't'       émer                po:ifut po:1sg            di:R
SFX c4   éner       ènerai/n'q'j'l'm't'       éner                po:ifut po:1sg            di:R
SFX c4   éper       èperai/n'q'j'l'm't'       éper                po:ifut po:1sg            di:R
SFX c4   équer      èquerai/n'q'j'l'm't'      équer               po:ifut po:1sg            di:R
SFX c4   érer       èrerai/n'q'j'l'm't'       érer                po:ifut po:1sg            di:R
SFX c4   éser       èserai/n'q'j'l'm't'       éser                po:ifut po:1sg            di:R
SFX c4   éter       èterai/n'q'j'l'm't'       éter                po:ifut po:1sg            di:R
SFX c4   étrer      ètrerai/n'q'j'l'm't'      étrer               po:ifut po:1sg            di:R
SFX c4   évrer      èvrerai/n'q'j'l'm't'      évrer               po:ifut po:1sg            di:R
SFX c4   éyer       èyerai/n'q'j'l'm't'       éyer                po:ifut po:1sg            di:R
SFX c4   er         eras/n'q'l'm't'           er                  po:ifut po:2sg            di:M
SFX c4   ébrer      èbreras/n'q'l'm't'        ébrer               po:ifut po:2sg            di:R
SFX c4   écer       èceras/n'q'l'm't'         écer                po:ifut po:2sg            di:R
SFX c4   écher      ècheras/n'q'l'm't'        écher               po:ifut po:2sg            di:R
SFX c4   écrer      ècreras/n'q'l'm't'        écrer               po:ifut po:2sg            di:R
SFX c4   éder       èderas/n'q'l'm't'         éder                po:ifut po:2sg            di:R
SFX c4   éger       ègeras/n'q'l'm't'         éger                po:ifut po:2sg            di:R
SFX c4   égler      ègleras/n'q'l'm't'        égler               po:ifut po:2sg            di:R
SFX c4   égner      ègneras/n'q'l'm't'        égner               po:ifut po:2sg            di:R
SFX c4   égrer      ègreras/n'q'l'm't'        égrer               po:ifut po:2sg            di:R
SFX c4   éguer      ègueras/n'q'l'm't'        éguer               po:ifut po:2sg            di:R
